Idaho, session 2026, H0673.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-614. ELECTION OF STATE REPRESENTATIVES AND SENATORS -- QUALIFICA-
TIONS. (1) At the general election, 1972, and every alternate year there-
after, there shall be elected in each legislative district such representa-
tives and senators as they may be severally entitled.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of representative or sena-
tor unless he shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time
of the general election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have, has
been a registered elector within the legislative district for one (1) year
next immediately preceding the general election at which he offers his can-
didacy, and has maintained a fixed habitation within the legislative dis-
trict boundaries for one (1) year immediately preceding the date such can-
didate files a declaration of candidacy for the office of representative or
senator. For the purposes of this subsection, "fixed habitation" means a
residence as defined in section 34-107, Idaho Code, at which the candidate
maintains actual physical presence and occupancy for at least one hundred
twenty (120) nights during the one (1) year period immediately preceding the
date such candidate files a declaration of candidacy for the office of repre-
sentative or senator.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) which shall be de-
posited in the general fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.